District of Columbia statutes.
7-1303.13

Effect of determination of incompetency to refuse commitment.

A determination by the Court under this subchapter that an individual 14 years of age or older is incompetent to refuse commitment shall not be relevant to a determination of the individual’s competency with respect to other matters not considered by the Court.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 313, 25 DCR 5094

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1933.
1973 Ed., § 6-1666.